Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3030
Digital asset depository; officer, director, employee, or agent; removal; grounds.

Each officer, director, employee, or agent of a digital asset depository, following written notice from the director, is subject to removal upon order of the director if such officer, director, employee, or agent knowingly, willfully, or negligently:

(1) Fails to perform any duty required by the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act or other applicable law;

(2) Fails to conform to any order or rules and regulations of the director; or

(3) Endangers the interest of a customer or the safety and soundness of the digital asset depository.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 30;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 41.